Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.110

Advisory board of plumbers.

(1) There is created a state advisory board of plumbers, to be composed of nine members appointed by the director. Two members shall be journey level plumbers, one member shall be a specialty plumber, three members shall be persons conducting a plumbing business, at least one of which shall be primarily engaged in a specialty plumbing business, one member representing the state-approved plumbing code body, one member from the department of health, and one member from the general public who is familiar with the business and trade of plumbing.

(2) The term of one journey level plumber expires July 1, 1995; the term of the second journey level plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of the specialty plumber expires July 1, 2008; the term of one person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 1996; the term of the second person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2000; the term of the third person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2007; the terms of the member representing the state-approved plumbing code body and the member from the department of health expire July 1, 2022; and the term of the public member expires July 1, 1997. Thereafter, upon the expiration of said terms, the director shall appoint a new member to serve for a period of three years. However, to ensure that the board can continue to act, a member whose term expires shall continue to serve until his or her replacement is appointed. In the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason, the director shall appoint a new member to serve out the term of the person whose position has become vacant.

(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the department on all matters relative to the enforcement of this chapter including plumbing industry promotion, standards of plumbing installations, consumer protection, and standards for the protection of public health.

(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended for each day in which such member is actually engaged in attendance upon the meetings of the advisory board.

[ 2020 c 153 s 12; 2013 c 23 s 24; 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 21; 2006 c 185 s 4; 1997 c 307 s 1; 1995 c 95 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 56; 1973 1st ex.s. c 175 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.

Effective date—1995 c 95: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 18, 1995]." [ 1995 c 95 s 2.]

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.